Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-2,251.03
Limited food service establishment, defined.

Limited food service establishment shall mean a food establishment that serves only alcoholic beverages or serves or otherwise provides only snack items or commercially prepared and wrapped foods that require little or no preparation.

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 12;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 34.
July 19, 2024